Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1501.01
Register of deeds; deputy; appointment; oath; duties.

When authorized by the county board, the register of deeds may appoint one or more deputies for whose acts he or she will be responsible. The register of deeds may not appoint the county treasurer, sheriff, clerk, or surveyor as deputy.

The appointment shall be in writing and revocable in writing by the register of deeds. Both the appointment and revocation shall be filed and kept in the office of the county clerk.

The deputy shall take the same oath as the register of deeds which shall be endorsed upon and filed with the certificate of appointment. The register of deeds may require a bond of the deputy.

In the absence or disability of the register of deeds, the deputy shall perform the duties of the register of deeds pertaining to the office, but when the register of deeds is required to act in conjunction with or in place of another officer, the deputy cannot act in the place of the register of deeds.

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 5.